District of Columbia statutes.
29-1007.01

Authority.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term “marketing contract” means a contract between a limited cooperative association and another person, that need not be a patron member:

(1)

Requiring the other person to sell, or deliver for sale or marketing on the person’s behalf, a specified part of the person’s products, commodities, or goods exclusively to or through the association or any facilities furnished by the association; or

(2)

Authorizing the association to act for the person in any manner with respect to the products, commodities, or goods.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 701 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition